Missouri, session 2026, HB1906.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 139.053, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 139.053, to read as follows:
139.053. 1. The governing body of any county[, excluding township counties,] may
by ordinance or order provide for the payment of all or any part of current real and personal
property taxes which are owed, at the option of the taxpayer, on an annual, semiannual or
quarterly basis at such times as determined by such governing body.
2. The ordinance shall provide the method by which the amount of property taxes
owed for the current tax year in which the payments are to be made shall be estimated. The
collector shall submit to the governing body the procedures by which taxes will be collected
pursuant to the ordinance or order. The estimate shall be based on the previous tax year's
liability. A taxpayer's payment schedule shall be based on the estimate divided by the number
of pay periods in which payments are to be made. The taxpayer shall at the end of the tax
year pay any amounts owed in excess of the estimate for such year. The county shall at the
end of the tax year refund to the taxpayer any amounts paid in excess of the property tax owed
for such year. No interest shall be paid by the county on excess amounts owed to the
taxpayer. Any refund paid the taxpayer pursuant to this subsection shall be an amount paid by
the county only once in a calendar year.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1906 2
3. If a taxpayer fails to make an installment payment of a portion of the real or
personal property taxes owed to the county, then such county may charge the taxpayer interest
on the amount of property taxes still owed for that year.
4. Any governing body enacting the ordinance or order specified in this section shall
first agree to provide the county collector with reasonable and necessary funds to implement
the ordinance or order.
5. Subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to payment for real property taxes by
financial institutions, as defined in section 381.410, who pay tax obligations which they
service from escrow accounts, as defined in Title 24, Part 3500, Section 17, Code of Federal
Regulation, as amended.
✔